District of Columbia statutes.
8-113.07

Denial, suspension, or revocation.

The Mayor may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or restore a license or certificate issued under § 8-113.06 to protect the public health, safety, or welfare if the Mayor finds that the applicant or holder has:

(1)

Failed to meet and maintain the standards established by this subchapter or rules issued pursuant to this subchapter;

(2)

Submitted a false or fraudulent record, invoice, or report;

(3)

Engaged in fraud or misrepresentation in the application for licensure or certification;

(4)

Had a history of repeated violations; or

(5)

Had his license or certification denied, revoked, or suspended in another state or jurisdiction.

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-242, § 8, 38 DCR 344
1981 Ed., § 6-995.7.